test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_saaha1_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - poorá:
    poorá+N+Sg+Nom:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Gen:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Acc:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Ill:  poorán
    poorá+N+Sg+Loc:  poorást
    poorá+N+Sg+Com:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Sg+Abe:  poˊráttáá
    poorá+N+Ess:  poorán
    poorá+N+Par:  poorád
    poorá+N+Pl+Nom:  pooráh
    poorá+N+Pl+Gen:  poorái
    poorá+N+Pl+Acc:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Ill:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Loc:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Pl+Com:  [pooráiguin, poˊráiguin]
    poorá+N+Pl+Abe:  [pooráittáá, poˊráittáá]

  Noun - sááhá:
    sááhá+N+Sg+Nom:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Gen:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Acc: sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Ill:  sááhán
    sááhá+N+Sg+Loc:  sááhást
    sááhá+N+Sg+Com:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Sg+Abe:  sáˊháttáá
    sááhá+N+Ess:  sááhhán
    sááhá+N+Par: sááhhád
    sááhá+N+Pl+Nom:  sááháh
    sááhá+N+Pl+Gen:  [sááhái, sáˊhái]
    sááhá+N+Pl+Acc:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Ill:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Loc:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Com:  sáˊháiguin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Abe:  sáˊháittáá
